Illinois, session 104th, HB2457.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-4.2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-4.2)7    Sec. 5-4.2. Ambulance services payments. 8    (a) For ambulance services provided to a recipient of aid 9under this Article on or after January 1, 1993, the Illinois 10Department shall reimburse ambulance service providers at 11rates calculated in accordance with this Section. It is the 12intent of the General Assembly to provide adequate 13reimbursement for ambulance services so as to ensure adequate 14access to services for recipients of aid under this Article 15and to provide appropriate incentives to ambulance service 16providers to provide services in an efficient and 17cost-effective manner. Thus, it is the intent of the General 18Assembly that the Illinois Department implement a 19reimbursement system for ambulance services that, to the 20extent practicable and subject to the availability of funds 21appropriated by the General Assembly for this purpose, is 22consistent with the payment principles of Medicare. To ensure 23uniformity between the payment principles of Medicare and   HB2457- 2 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1Medicaid, the Illinois Department shall follow, to the extent 2necessary and practicable and subject to the availability of 3funds appropriated by the General Assembly for this purpose, 4the statutes, laws, regulations, policies, procedures, 5principles, definitions, guidelines, and manuals used to 6determine the amounts paid to ambulance service providers 7under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (Medicare).8    (b) For ambulance services provided to a recipient of aid 9under this Article on or after January 1, 1996, the Illinois 10Department shall reimburse ambulance service providers based 11upon the actual distance traveled if a natural disaster, 12weather conditions, road repairs, or traffic congestion 13necessitates the use of a route other than the most direct 14route.15    (c) For purposes of this Section, "ambulance services" 16includes medical transportation services provided by means of 17an ambulance, air ambulance, medi-car, service car, or taxi.18    (c-1) For purposes of this Section, "ground ambulance 19service" means medical transportation services that are 20described as ground ambulance services by the Centers for 21Medicare and Medicaid Services and provided in a vehicle that 22is licensed as an ambulance by the Illinois Department of 23Public Health pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 24Systems Act.25    (c-2) For purposes of this Section, "ground ambulance 26service provider" means a vehicle service provider as   HB2457- 3 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1described in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act 2that operates licensed ambulances for the purpose of providing 3emergency ambulance services, or non-emergency ambulance 4services, or both. For purposes of this Section, this includes 5both ambulance providers and ambulance suppliers as described 6by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.7    (c-3) For purposes of this Section, "medi-car" means 8transportation services provided to a patient who is confined 9to a wheelchair and requires the use of a hydraulic or electric 10lift or ramp and wheelchair lockdown when the patient's 11condition does not require medical observation, medical 12supervision, medical equipment, the administration of 13medications, or the administration of oxygen. 14    (c-4) For purposes of this Section, "service car" means 15transportation services provided to a patient by a passenger 16vehicle where that patient does not require the specialized 17modes described in subsection (c-1) or (c-3). 18    (c-5) For purposes of this Section, "air ambulance 19service" means medical transport by helicopter or airplane for 20patients, as defined in 29 U.S.C. 1185f(c)(1), and any service 21that is described as an air ambulance service by the federal 22Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. 23    (d) This Section does not prohibit separate billing by 24ambulance service providers for oxygen furnished while 25providing advanced life support services.26    (e) Beginning with services rendered on or after July 1,   HB2457- 4 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b12008, all providers of non-emergency medi-car and service car 2transportation must certify that the driver and employee 3attendant, as applicable, have completed a safety program 4approved by the Department to protect both the patient and the 5driver, prior to transporting a patient. The provider must 6maintain this certification in its records. The provider shall 7produce such documentation upon demand by the Department or 8its representative. Failure to produce documentation of such 9training shall result in recovery of any payments made by the 10Department for services rendered by a non-certified driver or 11employee attendant. Medi-car and service car providers must 12maintain legible documentation in their records of the driver 13and, as applicable, employee attendant that actually 14transported the patient. Providers must recertify all drivers 15and employee attendants every 3 years. If they meet the 16established training components set forth by the Department, 17providers of non-emergency medi-car and service car 18transportation that are either directly or through an 19affiliated company licensed by the Department of Public Health 20shall be approved by the Department to have in-house safety 21programs for training their own staff. 22    Notwithstanding the requirements above, any public 23transportation provider of medi-car and service car 24transportation that receives federal funding under 49 U.S.C. 255307 and 5311 need not certify its drivers and employee 26attendants under this Section, since safety training is   HB2457- 5 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1already federally mandated. 2    (f) With respect to any policy or program administered by 3the Department or its agent regarding approval of 4non-emergency medical transportation by ground ambulance 5service providers, including, but not limited to, the 6Non-Emergency Transportation Services Prior Approval Program 7(NETSPAP), the Department shall establish by rule a process by 8which ground ambulance service providers of non-emergency 9medical transportation may appeal any decision by the 10Department or its agent for which no denial was received prior 11to the time of transport that either (i) denies a request for 12approval for payment of non-emergency transportation by means 13of ground ambulance service or (ii) grants a request for 14approval of non-emergency transportation by means of ground 15ambulance service at a level of service that entitles the 16ground ambulance service provider to a lower level of 17compensation from the Department than the ground ambulance 18service provider would have received as compensation for the 19level of service requested. The rule shall be filed by 20December 15, 2012 and shall provide that, for any decision 21rendered by the Department or its agent on or after the date 22the rule takes effect, the ground ambulance service provider 23shall have 60 days from the date the decision is received to 24file an appeal. The rule established by the Department shall 25be, insofar as is practical, consistent with the Illinois 26Administrative Procedure Act. The Director's decision on an   HB2457- 6 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1appeal under this Section shall be a final administrative 2decision subject to review under the Administrative Review 3Law. 4    (f-5) Beginning 90 days after July 20, 2012 (the effective 5date of Public Act 97-842), (i) no denial of a request for 6approval for payment of non-emergency transportation by means 7of ground ambulance service, and (ii) no approval of 8non-emergency transportation by means of ground ambulance 9service at a level of service that entitles the ground 10ambulance service provider to a lower level of compensation 11from the Department than would have been received at the level 12of service submitted by the ground ambulance service provider, 13may be issued by the Department or its agent unless the 14Department has submitted the criteria for determining the 15appropriateness of the transport for first notice publication 16in the Illinois Register pursuant to Section 5-40 of the 17Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 18    (f-6) Within 90 days after June 2, 2022 (the effective 19date of Public Act 102-1037) and subject to federal approval, 20the Department shall file rules to allow for the approval of 21ground ambulance services when the sole purpose of the 22transport is for the navigation of stairs or the assisting or 23lifting of a patient at a medical facility or during a medical 24appointment in instances where the Department or a contracted 25Medicaid managed care organization or their transportation 26broker is unable to secure transportation through any other   HB2457- 7 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1transportation provider. 2    (f-7) For non-emergency ground ambulance claims properly 3denied under Department policy at the time the claim is filed 4due to failure to submit a valid Medical Certification for 5Non-Emergency Ambulance on and after December 15, 2012 and 6prior to January 1, 2021, the Department shall allot 7$2,000,000 to a pool to reimburse such claims if the provider 8proves medical necessity for the service by other means. 9Providers must submit any such denied claims for which they 10seek compensation to the Department no later than December 31, 112021 along with documentation of medical necessity. No later 12than May 31, 2022, the Department shall determine for which 13claims medical necessity was established. Such claims for 14which medical necessity was established shall be paid at the 15rate in effect at the time of the service, provided the 16$2,000,000 is sufficient to pay at those rates. If the pool is 17not sufficient, claims shall be paid at a uniform percentage 18of the applicable rate such that the pool of $2,000,000 is 19exhausted. The appeal process described in subsection (f) 20shall not be applicable to the Department's determinations 21made in accordance with this subsection. 22    (g) Whenever a patient covered by a medical assistance 23program under this Code or by another medical program 24administered by the Department, including a patient covered 25under the State's Medicaid managed care program, is being 26transported from a facility and requires non-emergency   HB2457- 8 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1transportation including ground ambulance, medi-car, or 2service car transportation, a Physician Certification 3Statement as described in this Section shall be required for 4each patient. Facilities shall develop procedures for a 5licensed medical professional to provide a written and signed 6Physician Certification Statement. The Physician Certification 7Statement shall specify the level of transportation services 8needed and complete a medical certification establishing the 9criteria for approval of non-emergency ambulance 10transportation, as published by the Department of Healthcare 11and Family Services, that is met by the patient. This 12certification shall be completed prior to ordering the 13transportation service and prior to patient discharge. The 14Physician Certification Statement is not required prior to 15transport if a delay in transport can be expected to 16negatively affect the patient outcome. If the ground ambulance 17provider, medi-car provider, or service car provider is unable 18to obtain the required Physician Certification Statement 19within 10 calendar days following the date of the service, the 20ground ambulance provider, medi-car provider, or service car 21provider must document its attempt to obtain the requested 22certification and may then submit the claim for payment. 23Acceptable documentation includes a signed return receipt from 24the U.S. Postal Service, facsimile receipt, email receipt, or 25other similar service that evidences that the ground ambulance 26provider, medi-car provider, or service car provider attempted   HB2457- 9 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1to obtain the required Physician Certification Statement. 2    The medical certification specifying the level and type of 3non-emergency transportation needed shall be in the form of 4the Physician Certification Statement on a standardized form 5prescribed by the Department of Healthcare and Family 6Services. Within 75 days after July 27, 2018 (the effective 7date of Public Act 100-646), the Department of Healthcare and 8Family Services shall develop a standardized form of the 9Physician Certification Statement specifying the level and 10type of transportation services needed in consultation with 11the Department of Public Health, Medicaid managed care 12organizations, a statewide association representing ambulance 13providers, a statewide association representing hospitals, 3 14statewide associations representing nursing homes, and other 15stakeholders. The Physician Certification Statement shall 16include, but is not limited to, the criteria necessary to 17demonstrate medical necessity for the level of transport 18needed as required by (i) the Department of Healthcare and 19Family Services and (ii) the federal Centers for Medicare and 20Medicaid Services as outlined in the Centers for Medicare and 21Medicaid Services' Medicare Benefit Policy Manual, Pub. 22100-02, Chap. 10, Sec. 10.2.1, et seq. The use of the Physician 23Certification Statement shall satisfy the obligations of 24hospitals under Section 6.22 of the Hospital Licensing Act and 25nursing homes under Section 2-217 of the Nursing Home Care 26Act. Implementation and acceptance of the Physician   HB2457- 10 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1Certification Statement shall take place no later than 90 days 2after the issuance of the Physician Certification Statement by 3the Department of Healthcare and Family Services. 4    Pursuant to subsection (E) of Section 12-4.25 of this 5Code, the Department is entitled to recover overpayments paid 6to a provider or vendor, including, but not limited to, from 7the discharging physician, the discharging facility, and the 8ground ambulance service provider, in instances where a 9non-emergency ground ambulance service is rendered as the 10result of improper or false certification. 11    Beginning October 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 12and Family Services shall collect data from Medicaid managed 13care organizations and transportation brokers, including the 14Department's NETSPAP broker, regarding denials and appeals 15related to the missing or incomplete Physician Certification 16Statement forms and overall compliance with this subsection. 17The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall publish 18quarterly results on its website within 15 days following the 19end of each quarter. 20    (h) On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce 21any rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or 22alter any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any 23rate of reimbursement for services or other payments in 24accordance with Section 5-5e. 25    (i) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 262024, the Department shall increase the base rate of   HB2457- 11 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1reimbursement for both base charges and mileage charges for 2ground ambulance service providers not participating in the 3Ground Emergency Medical Transportation (GEMT) Program for 4medical transportation services provided by means of a ground 5ambulance to a level not lower than 140% of the base rate in 6effect as of January 1, 2023.7    (j) For the purpose of understanding ground ambulance 8transportation services cost structures and their impact on 9the Medical Assistance Program, the Department shall engage 10stakeholders, including, but not limited to, a statewide 11association representing private ground ambulance service 12providers in Illinois, to develop recommendations for a plan 13for the regular collection of cost data for all ground 14ambulance transportation providers reimbursed under the 15Illinois Title XIX State Plan. Cost data obtained through this 16process shall be used to inform on and to ensure the 17effectiveness and efficiency of Illinois Medicaid rates. The 18Department shall establish a process to limit public 19availability of portions of the cost report data determined to 20be proprietary. This process shall be concluded and 21recommendations shall be provided no later than December 31, 222025. 23    (k) Subject to federal approval, beginning on January 1, 242024, the Department shall increase the base rate of 25reimbursement for both base charges and mileage charges for 26medical transportation services provided by means of an air   HB2457- 12 -LRB104 08103 KTG 18149 b1ambulance to a level not lower than 50% of the Medicare 2ambulance fee schedule rates, by designated Medicare locality, 3in effect on January 1, 2023. 4    (l) Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 5increase the base rate of reimbursement for both base charges 6and mileage charges for medical transportation services 7provided by means of an air ambulance to a level not lower than 875% of the Medicare ambulance fee schedule rates, by 9designated Medicare locality. 10(Source: P.A. 102-364, eff. 1-1-22; 102-650, eff. 8-27-21; 11102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1037, eff. 6-2-22; 103-102, Article 1270, Section 70-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 80, Section 1380-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 147-1-24.)